src/fst/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON N_VCCS !!≈ * @CODE@ Stems ending in soft consonant cluster
:%{VCCS%}%>ныл SG_ABL_K ;
:%{VCCS%}%>ыл SG_INS_K ; !
:%{VCCS%}%>ын SG_LAT_K ; !
:%{VCCS%}%>ыт SG_LOC_K ; !
:%{VCCS%} SG_NOM_K ;
:%{VCCS%}%>ыг SG_TRA_K ;!
:%{VCCS%} SG_X_PXSG1_ujum ;
:%{VCCS%} SG_X_PXSG2_yn ;
:%{VCCS%} SG_X_PXSG3_te ;
:%{VCCS%} SG_X_PXSG3_tee ;
:%{VCCS%} SG_X_PXPL1_ujuv ;
:%{VCCS%} SG_X_PXPL3_ajanyl ;
:%{VCCS%} N1_DU ;
:%{VCCS%} N1_PL ;

:%{VCCS%} SG_X_PXDU2_yyn ;
:%{VCCS%} SG_X_PXDU2_yn ;
:%{VCCS%} SG_X_PXDU3_een ;
:%{VCCS%} SG_X_PXDU3_en ;
:%{VCCS%} SG_X_PXPL2_yn ;
:%{VCCS%} SG_X_PXPL2_yyn ;

:%{VCCS%} DU_X_PXDU1_ajagmeen ;
:%{VCCS%} DU_X_PXDU2_ajagyyn ;
:%{VCCS%} DU_X_PXDU2_ajagyn ;
:%{VCCS%} DU_X_PXDU3_ajageen ;
:%{VCCS%} DU_X_PXDU3_ajagen ;
:%{VCCS%} DU_X_PXPL2_ajagyyn ;
:%{VCCS%} DU_X_PXPL2_ajagyn ;

:%{VCCS%} PL_X_PXDU1_ajanameen ;
:%{VCCS%} PL_X_PXDU1_ajanamen ;
:%{VCCS%} PL_X_PXDU2_ajanyyn ;
:%{VCCS%} PL_X_PXDU2_ajanyn ;
:%{VCCS%} PL_X_PXDU2_ajan ;
:%{VCCS%} PL_X_PXDU3_ajaneen ;
:%{VCCS%} PL_X_PXDU3_ajanen ;
:%{VCCS%} PL_X_PXPL2_ajan ;
:%{VCCS%} PL_X_PXPL2_ajanyn ;
:%{VCCS%} PL_X_PXPL2_ajanyyn ;

:%{VCCS%} SG_NOM_PXSG3_e ;
:%{VCCS%} SG_ABL/INS/LAT/LOC/TRA_PXSG3_e ;
:%{VCCS%} SG_ABL/INS/LAT/LOC/TRA_PXSG3_ee ;
:%{VCCS%} SG_X_PXDU1_meen ;
:%{VCCS%} SG_X_PXDU1_men ;
:%{VCCS%} DU_X_PXDU1_ajagameen ;
:%{VCCS%} DU_X_PXDU1_ajagamen ;


LEXICON N1_
 N1_SG ;
 N1_DU ;
 N1_PL ;
 N1_SG_X_PXDU_LONG ;
 N1_DU_X_PXDU_LONG ;
 N1_PL_X_PXDU_LONG ;
! N1_SG_X_PXDU_SHORT ;
! N1_DU_X_PXDU_SHORT ;
! N1_PL_X_PXDU_SHORT ;

!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** There are three Mansi noun lexicons, divided according to number Sg, Du, Pl, such that Propernouns are singular. They has entries of two types:
! noun in ь + ыт
!! ### 1. Non-possessive forms 
!! affixes for Nom, Loc, Lat, Abl, Ins, Tra.
LEXICON N1_SG
:%>ныл SG_ABL_K ;
:%>ыл SG_INS_K ; !
:%>ын SG_LAT_K ; !
:%>ыт SG_LOC_K ; !
: SG_NOM_K ;
:%>ыг SG_TRA_K ;!потрыг, са̄лыиг
!+Sg+Loc:%>ыт K ; ! not like Pl Nom(only: потрыт)!! потырт/потрыт, са̄лыт, э̄кват, 
!+Sg+Lat:%>ын K ; !Check to see that has the same pattern as Sg+Loc vs Pl+Nom потрын, са̄лын
!+Sg+Ins:%>%{тØ%}ыл K ; ! 43 stems, no т.
!+Sg+Ins:%>%{ыиØ%}л K ; ! 43 stems, no т.
!+Sg+Loc:%>%{ыиØ%}т K ; ! -ыт/ _ CC, -т elsewhere
!+Sg+Lat:%>%{ыиØ%}н K ; ! -ын as -ыт above

!! ### 2. Possessive forms
!! Affixes for pissessive suffixes + case forms.
 SG_X_PXSG1_ujum ;
 SG_X_PXSG2_yn ;! vowel retension потырын, са̄лын

 SG_X_PXSG3_te ;
 SG_ABL_PXSG3_tee ;
 SG_INS_PXSG3_tee ;
 SG_LAT_PXSG3_tee ;
 SG_LOC_PXSG3_tee ;
 SG_TRA_PXSG3_tee ;

 SG_X_PXPL1_ujuv ;
 SG_X_PXPL3_ajanyl ;


LEXICON N1_SG_X_PXDU_LONG
 SG_ABL/INS/LAT/LOC_PXDU1_ujumeen ;
 SG_X_PXDU2_yyn ;
 SG_X_PXDU3_een ;
 SG_X_PXPL2_yn ;


LEXICON N1_SG_X_PXDU_SHORT
 SG_ABL/INS/LAT/LOC_PXDU1_ujumen ;
 SG_X_PXDU2_yn ;
 SG_X_PXDU3_ten ;
 SG_X_PXPL2_yn ;

LEXICON N1_DU
:%>ыгныл DU_ABL_K ;
:%>ыгтыл DU_INS_K ;
:%>ыгн DU_LAT_K ;
:%>ыгт DU_LOC_K ;
:%>ыг DU_NOM_K ; ! а̄ныйыг, э̄кваг, потырыг

!! ### 2. Possessive forms
!! Affixes for pissessive suffixes + case forms.
 DU_X_PXSG1_ajagum ;
 DU_X_PXSG2_ajagyn ;
 DU_NOM_PXSG2_ajagn ;!2023_05_02

 DU_X_PXSG3_ajage ;
 DU_ABL/INS/LAT/LOC_PXSG3_ajagee ;

 DU_X_PXPL1_ajaguv ;
 DU_X_PXPL3_aganyl ;
+Err/Orth: DU_X_PXPL3_agaanyl ;


LEXICON N1_DU_X_PXDU_LONG
 DU_X_PXDU1_ajagumeen ;
 DU_X_PXDU2_ajagyn ;
 DU_X_PXDU3_ajagen ;
 DU_X_PXPL2_ajagyn ;

LEXICON N1_DU_X_PXDU_SHORT
 DU_X_PXDU1_ajagamen ;
! DU_X_PXDU2_SHORT ;
 DU_X_PXDU2_ajagyyn ;!20230502
 DU_X_PXDU2_ajagyn ;!20230502
 DU_X_PXDU3_ajagen ;
! DU_X_PXPL2_SHORT ;
 DU_X_PXPL2_ajagyn ;

LEXICON N1_PL
:%>ыт PL_NOM_K ; ! а̄ныт, акит, па̄ртыт
:%>ытт PL_LOC_K ;! потрытт
:%>ытыт PL_LOC_K ;! павлытыт, ӯсытыт, CHECKME 20230527 should these be limited to a few stems?
:%>ытн PL_LAT_K ;
!:%>ытын PL_LAT_K ; jr
:%>ытныл PL_ABL_K ;
:%>ытыл PL_INS_K ; ! потрытыл


!! ### 2. Possessive forms
!! Affixes for pissessive suffixes + case forms.
 PL_X_PXSG1_ajanum ;
  PL_X_PXSG2_ajan ;
  PL_X_PXSG2_ajanyn ;
 PL_X_PXSG3_ajane ;
 PL_ABL/INS/LAT/LOC_PXSG3_ajanee ;
 PL_X_PXPL1_ajanuv ;
 PL_X_PXPL3_ajananyl ;
 PL_X_PXPL3_ajanyl ;


!! ### 3. Derivation forms
!! This points all nouns to **A_** via the *-ыӈ* syffix and to **Adv** via the *-ыщ* derivational suffix.
+Der+Der/Yng+A:%>ыӈ A_ ;
+Der+Der/Yng+A+Der+Der/Yshch+Adv:%>ыщ ADV_ ;




LEXICON N1_PL_X_PXDU_LONG
 PL_X_PXDU1_ajanmeen ;
 PL_X_PXDU2_ajanyn ;
 PL_X_PXDU3_ajanen ;
 PL_X_PXPL2_ajan ;
 PL_X_PXPL2_ajanyn ;



!!!!msn
!! sg x pxsg1
LEXICON SG_X_PXSG1_ujum
 SG_ABL_PXSG1_K ;
 SG_INS_PXSG1_K ;
 SG_LAT_PXSG1_K ;
 SG_LOC_PXSG1_K ;
 SG_NOM_PXSG1_K ;
 SG_TRA_PXSG1_K ;

!! sg x pxsg2
LEXICON SG_X_PXSG2_yn
 SG_ABL_PXSG2_K ;
 SG_INS_PXSG2_K ;
 SG_LAT_PXSG2_K ;
 SG_LOC_PXSG2_K ;
 SG_NOM_PXSG2_K ;
 SG_TRA_PXSG2_K ;

!! sg x pxsg3
LEXICON SG_X_PXSG3_te
 SG_ABL_PXSG3_te ;
 SG_INS_PXSG3_te ;
 SG_LAT_PXSG3_te ;
 SG_LOC_PXSG3_te ;
 SG_NOM_PXSG3_te ;
 SG_TRA_PXSG3_te ;
LEXICON SG_ABL_PXSG3_te
:%>%{тØ%}%{ЭЕ%}ныл SG_ABL_PXSG3_K ;
LEXICON SG_INS_PXSG3_te
:%>%{тØ%}%{ЭЕ%}нтыл SG_INS_PXSG3_K ;
LEXICON SG_LAT_PXSG3_te
:%>%{тØ%}%{ЭЕ%}н SG_LAT_PXSG3_K ;
LEXICON SG_LOC_PXSG3_te
:%>%{тØ%}%{ЭЕ%}т SG_LOC_PXSG3_K ;! потре̄т but э̄кватэт, са̄лытэт
LEXICON SG_NOM_PXSG3_te
:%>%{тØ%}%{ЭЕ%} SG_NOM_PXSG3_K ; ! todo: delete т for хап
LEXICON SG_TRA_PXSG3_te
:%>%{тØ%}%{ЭЕ%}г SG_TRA_PXSG3_K ;

LEXICON SG_X_PXSG3_tee
 SG_ABL_PXSG3_tee ;
 SG_INS_PXSG3_tee ;
 SG_LAT_PXSG3_tee ;
 SG_LOC_PXSG3_tee ;
 SG_NOM_PXSG3_tee ;
 SG_TRA_PXSG3_tee ;
LEXICON SG_ABL_PXSG3_tee
:%>%{тØ%}%{ЭЕLong%}ныл SG_ABL_PXSG3_K ;
LEXICON SG_INS_PXSG3_tee
:%>%{тØ%}%{ЭЕLong%}нтыл SG_INS_PXSG3_K ;
LEXICON SG_LAT_PXSG3_tee
:%>%{тØ%}%{ЭЕLong%}н SG_LAT_PXSG3_K ;
LEXICON SG_LOC_PXSG3_tee
:%>%{тØ%}%{ЭЕLong%}т SG_LOC_PXSG3_K ;! потре̄т but э̄кватэт, са̄лытэт
LEXICON SG_NOM_PXSG3_tee
:%>%{тØ%}%{ЭЕLong%} SG_NOM_PXSG3_K ; ! todo: delete т for хап
LEXICON SG_TRA_PXSG3_tee
:%>%{тØ%}%{ЭЕLong%}г SG_TRA_PXSG3_K ;

LEXICON SG_ABL/INS/LAT/LOC/TRA_PXSG3_te
 SG_ABL_PXSG3_te ;
 SG_INS_PXSG3_te ;
 SG_LAT_PXSG3_te ;
 SG_LOC_PXSG3_te ;
 SG_TRA_PXSG3_te ;

LEXICON SG_ABL/INS/LAT/LOC/TRA_PXSG3_tee
 SG_ABL_PXSG3_tee ;
 SG_INS_PXSG3_tee ;
 SG_LAT_PXSG3_tee ;
 SG_LOC_PXSG3_tee ;
 SG_TRA_PXSG3_tee ;

LEXICON SG_ABL/INS/LAT/LOC/TRA_PXSG3_e
 SG_ABL_PXSG3_e ;
 SG_INS_PXSG3_e ;
 SG_LAT_PXSG3_e ;
 SG_LOC_PXSG3_e ;
 SG_TRA_PXSG3_e ;
LEXICON SG_ABL_PXSG3_e
:%>%{ЭЕ%}ныл SG_ABL_PXSG3_K ;
LEXICON SG_INS_PXSG3_e
:%>%{ЭЕ%}нтыл SG_INS_PXSG3_K ;
LEXICON SG_LAT_PXSG3_e
:%>%{ЭЕ%}н SG_LAT_PXSG3_K ;
LEXICON SG_LOC_PXSG3_e
:%>%{ЭЕ%}т SG_LOC_PXSG3_K ;! потре̄т but э̄кватэт, са̄лытэт
LEXICON SG_NOM_PXSG3_e
:%>%{ЭЕ%} SG_NOM_PXSG3_K ; ! todo: delete т for хап
LEXICON SG_TRA_PXSG3_e
:%>%{ЭЕ%}г SG_TRA_PXSG3_K ;

LEXICON SG_ABL/INS/LAT/LOC/TRA_PXSG3_ee
 SG_ABL_PXSG3_ee ;
 SG_INS_PXSG3_ee ;
 SG_LAT_PXSG3_ee ;
 SG_LOC_PXSG3_ee ;
 SG_TRA_PXSG3_ee ;
LEXICON SG_ABL_PXSG3_ee
:%>%{ЭЕLong%}ныл SG_ABL_PXSG3_K ;
LEXICON SG_INS_PXSG3_ee
:%>%{ЭЕLong%}нтыл SG_INS_PXSG3_K ;
LEXICON SG_LAT_PXSG3_ee
:%>%{ЭЕLong%}н SG_LAT_PXSG3_K ;
LEXICON SG_LOC_PXSG3_ee
:%>%{ЭЕLong%}т SG_LOC_PXSG3_K ;! потре̄т but э̄кватэт, са̄лытэт
LEXICON SG_TRA_PXSG3_ee
:%>%{ЭЕLong%}г SG_TRA_PXSG3_K ;

!! sg x pxdu1
LEXICON SG_X_PXDU1_meen
 SG_ABL_PXDU1_meen ;
 SG_INS_PXDU1_meen ;
 SG_LAT_PXDU1_meen ;
 SG_LOC_PXDU1_meen ;
 SG_NOM_PXDU1_meen ;
LEXICON SG_ABL_PXDU1_meen
:%>ме̄нныл SG_ABL_PXDU1_K ;
LEXICON SG_INS_PXDU1_meen
:%>ме̄нтыл SG_INS_PXDU1_K ;
LEXICON SG_LAT_PXDU1_meen
:%>ме̄нн SG_LAT_PXDU1_K ;
LEXICON SG_LOC_PXDU1_meen
:%>ме̄нт SG_LOC_PXDU1_K ;
LEXICON SG_NOM_PXDU1_meen
:%>ме̄н SG_NOM_PXDU1_K ;

LEXICON SG_X_PXDU1_men
 SG_ABL_PXDU1_men ;
 SG_INS_PXDU1_men ;
 SG_LAT_PXDU1_men ;
 SG_LOC_PXDU1_men ;
 SG_NOM_PXDU1_men ;
LEXICON SG_ABL_PXDU1_men
:%>менныл SG_ABL_PXDU1_K ;
LEXICON SG_INS_PXDU1_men
:%>ментыл SG_INS_PXDU1_K ;
LEXICON SG_LAT_PXDU1_men
:%>менн SG_LAT_PXDU1_K ;
LEXICON SG_LOC_PXDU1_men
:%>мент SG_LOC_PXDU1_K ;
LEXICON SG_NOM_PXDU1_men
:%>мен SG_NOM_PXDU1_K ;
