src/fst/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON Nouns
ансамбль+N:ансамбль N_VCCS "ансамбль" ;
бдительность+N:бдительность N_VCCS "бдительность" ;
безопасность+N:безопасность N_VCCS "безопасность" ;
бинокль+N:бинокль N_VCCS "бинокль" ;
верфь+N:верфь N_VCCS "верфь" ;
вла̄сть+v1+N:вла̄сть N_VCCS "власть" ; !!≈ * @CODE@ CHECKME
вла̄сть+v2+N:власть N_VCCS "власть" ;
водоросль+N:водоросль N_VCCS "водоросль" ;
вождь+N:вождь N_VCCS "вождь" ;
груздь+N:груздь N_VCCS "груздь" ;
дека̄брь+N:дека̄брь N_VCCS "декабрь" ;
корабль+N:корабль N_VCCS ;
котьль+N:котьль N_VCCS "середина" ;
крепость+N:крепость N_VCCS "крепость" ;
народность+N:народность N_VCCS "народность" ;
независимость+N:независимость N_VCCS "независимость" ;
нефть+N:нефть N_VCCS "нефть" ;
но̄ябрь+N:но̄ябрь N_VCCS "ноябрь" ;
область+N:область N_VCCS ;
обязанность+N:обязанность N_VCCS "обязанность" ;
октя̄брь+N:октя̄брь N_VCCS "октябрь" ;
письменность+N:письменность N_VCCS "письменность" ;
повесть+N:повесть N_VCCS "повесть" ;
промышленность+N:промышленность N_VCCS "промышленность" ;
рубль+N:рубль N_VCCS "рубль" ;
самодеятельность+N:самодеятельность N_VCCS "самодеятельность" ;
сельдь+N:сельдь N_VCCS "сельдь" ;
сентябрь+N:сентябрь N_VCCS "сентябрь" ;
спектакль+N:спектакль N_VCCS "спектакль" ;
специальность+N:специальность N_VCCS "специальность" ;
честь+N:честь N_VCCS "честь" ;
